Florida, session 2026, HB1149.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1003.455, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
1003.455 Physical education; assessment.—
(6) In addition to the requirements in subsection (3),
each district school board shall provide at least 100 minutes of
supervised, safe, and unstructured free-play recess each week
for students in kindergarten through grade 8 5 so that there are
at least 20 consecutive minutes of free-play recess per day.
This requirement does not apply to charter schools.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1149-00